Florida, session 2026, SB1684.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 28 29 Section 1.âSection 458.352, Florida Statutes, is created to 30 read: 31 458.352âParkinsonâs disease registry; reporting 32 requirement.â 33 (1)âBeginning January 1, 2027, each physician who diagnoses 34 or treats a patient for Parkinsonâs disease shall report to the 35 statewide Parkinsonâs disease registry, established pursuant to 36 s. 1004.4352, information containing nationally recognized 37 Parkinsonâs disease performance measures. 38 (2)âA liability of any kind or character for damages or 39 other relief may not arise or be enforced against a physician by 40 reason of having provided such information to the statewide 41 Parkinsonâs disease registry. 42 Section 2.âSection 459.075, Florida Statutes, is created to 43 read: 44 459.075âParkinsonâs disease registry; reporting 45 requirement.â 46 (1)âBeginning January 1, 2027, each physician who diagnoses 47 or treats a patient for Parkinsonâs disease shall report to the 48 statewide Parkinsonâs disease registry, established pursuant to 49 s. 1004.4352, information containing nationally recognized 50 Parkinsonâs disease performance measures. 51 (2)âA liability of any kind or character for damages or 52 other relief may not arise or be enforced against a physician by 53 reason of having provided such information to the statewide 54 Parkinsonâs disease registry. 55 Section 3.âSection 464.0124, Florida Statutes, is created 56 to read: 57 464.0124âParkinsonâs disease registry; advanced practice 58 registered nurse reporting requirement.â 59 (1)âBeginning January 1, 2027, each advanced practice 60 registered nurse who diagnoses or treats a patient for 61 Parkinsonâs disease shall report to the statewide Parkinsonâs 62 disease registry, established pursuant to s. 1004.4352, 63 information containing nationally recognized Parkinsonâs disease 64 performance measures. 65 (2)âA liability of any kind or character for damages or 66 other relief may not arise or be enforced against an advanced 67 practice registered nurse by reason of having provided such 68 information to the statewide Parkinsonâs disease registry. 69 Section 4.âParagraphs (b) and (e) of subsection (4) of 70 section 1004.4352, Florida Statutes, are amended, and subsection 71 (5) is added to that section, to read: 72 1004.4352âParkinsonâs disease research.â 73 (4)âCONSORTIUM FOR PARKINSONâS DISEASE RESEARCH.â 74 (b)âThe Parkinsonâs Disease Research Board is established 75 to direct the operations of the consortium. The board shall be 76 composed of one member appointed by the President of the Senate, 77 one member appointed by the Speaker of the House of 78 Representatives, and members representing each participating 79 university or academic medical center, appointed by the 80 president or chief executive officer of each participating 81 university or academic medical center. Board members, other than 82 those appointed by the President of the Senate or the Speaker of 83 the House of Representatives, must have experience as a movement 84 disorder specialist and in informatics or population health 85 research and Parkinsonâs disease research in a variety of 86 scientific fields, including, but not limited to, neurology, 87 psychology, nutrition, and genetics. Members shall be appointed 88 to 3-year 4-year terms and may be reappointed to serve 89 additional terms. The chair shall be elected by the board from 90 among its members to serve a 2-year term. The board shall meet 91 at least semiannually at the call of the chair or, in his or her 92 absence or incapacity, the vice chair. Four members constitute a 93 quorum. A majority vote of the members present is required for 94 all actions of the board. The board may prescribe, amend, and 95 repeal a charter governing the manner in which it conducts its 96 business. Board members shall serve without compensation, but 97 are entitled to receive reimbursement for travel expenses by the 98 consortium or the organization he or she represents in 99 accordance with s. 112.061. 100 (e)âBy October 15 of each year, the board shall issue a 101 report to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the 102 Speaker of the House of Representatives on research projects, 103 research findings, and community outreach initiatives conducted 104 or funded by, and future plans for the consortium. Beginning on 105 October 15, 2028, and annually thereafter, the report must 106 include a summary update on the incidence and prevalence of 107 Parkinsonâs disease in this state by county, how many records 108 have been included and reported to the registry, and demographic 109 information, such as patients by age, gender, and race. 110 (5)âPARKINSONâS DISEASE REGISTRY.â 111 (a)âSubject to a specific appropriation, the Florida 112 Institute for Parkinsonâs Disease at the University of South 113 Florida shall establish and maintain a statewide Parkinsonâs 114 disease registry to ensure that the Parkinsonâs disease 115 performance measures required to be submitted under paragraph 116 (b) are maintained and available for use to improve or modify 117 the Parkinsonâs disease care system, ensure compliance with 118 standards and nationally recognized guidelines, and monitor 119 Parkinsonâs disease patient outcomes. 120 (b)âPhysicians licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459, 121 pursuant to ss. 458.352 and 459.075, and advanced practice 122 registered nurses licensed under chapter 464, pursuant to s. 123 464.0124, shall regularly report to the statewide Parkinsonâs 124 disease registry information containing nationally recognized 125 Parkinsonâs disease performance measures. 126 (c)âBeginning January 1, 2028, the Institute for 127 Parkinsonâs Disease at the University of South Florida shall 128 create and maintain a public website dedicated solely to the 129 Parkinsonâs disease registry which must include, at a minimum, 130 downloadable annual reports on the incidence and prevalence of 131 Parkinsonâs disease, information on the consortium, and other 132 information as determined by the board. The website must be 133 updated by January 1, 2029, and annually thereafter. 134 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.